Maryland, session 2025, HB1513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1513*

HOUSE BILL 1513
Article – Education
7–1501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) “School resource officer” means:
(1) A law enforcement officer as defined under § 1–101(c) of the Public
Safety Article who has been assigned to a school in accordance with a memorandum of
understanding between the chief of a law enforcement agency as defined under § 3–201(d)
of the Public Safety Article and the local education agency; or
(2) A Baltimore City school police officer, as defined in § 4–318 of this
article.
(k) “School security employee” means an individual, as defined in regulations
adopted by the Subcabinet, who:
(1) Is not a school resource officer; and
(2) Is employed by a local school system to provide safety and
security–related services at a public school.
7–1508.1.
AN INDIVIDUAL ASSIGNED TO BE A SCHOOL RESOURCE OFFICER OR A SCHOOL
SECURITY EMPLOYEE AT A PUBLIC SCHOOL MAY NOT BE USED FOR PURPOSES OF OR
OTHERWISE ENGAGE IN FEDERAL IMMIGRATION INVESTIGATION OR ENFORCEMENT
FUNCTIONS UNDER § 287(G) OF THE FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AND NATIONALITY
ACT AT THE PUBLIC SCHOOL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.